District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.38

Minimum limit modification for noncitizens and aliens.

The minimum limit on monthly compensation for disability under § 1-623.12 and the minimum limit on monthly pay on which death compensation is computed under § 1-623.33 do not apply in the case of a noncitizen employee or a class or classes of noncitizen employees who sustain injury outside the continental United States. The Mayor may establish a minimum monthly pay on which death compensation is computed in the case of a class or classes of such noncitizen employees.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2338, 25 DCR 5740
1973 Ed., § 1-353.38.
1981 Ed., § 1-624.38.
This section is referenced in § 1-623.12.